Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. Community Colleges.

Sec. 14.40.560.
Authority to cooperate.

A qualified school district or political subdivision may make an agreement with the University of Alaska for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of a community college.
A qualified school district or qualified political subdivision shall pay all instructional and administrative costs for nondegree college programs and activities offered.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Sec. 14.40.570.
Authority of board.

Since academic education beyond the high school level is a statewide responsibility, the board, in its discretion and as the need arises, may cooperate with the federal government and qualified school districts and political subdivisions in the establishment of appropriate higher educational programs and activities. The board is responsible for the selection of all community college instructors, part and full-time, for the academic degree programs and activities, and shall pay all instructional and administrative costs, including cost of special equipment and instructional materials, for academic degree programs and activities offered.

Selected upper division and graduate level courses of instruction, offered by the university through its off-campus instructional program to meet local needs, may be coordinated through the office of the director of a community college.

History.

(§ 4 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Sec. 14.40.580.
Use of joint facilities.

If facilities used by the community college are owned by the school district or political subdivision, the board, subject to availability of appropriated funds, may reimburse the school district for all expenses directly related to facilities for academic degree programs and activities. The school district or political subdivision shall bear all expenses directly related to nondegree programs and activities.

If separate facilities are financed, constructed, or maintained from federal, state, or private funds for either academic degree or nonacademic degree programs and activities of the community college, then the board has title to and control of the separate facilities used for these purposes. If separate facilities are financed, constructed, or maintained from school district or political subdivision funds for either degree or nondegree programs and activities, the school district or political subdivision has title to and control of the separate facilities used for these purposes.

History.

(§ 5 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Sec. 14.40.590.
Director.

The administrative head of a community college established by the University of Alaska in cooperation with school districts or political subdivisions is a director.
The director shall be selected by the board, subject to approval by the governing body of the school district or political subdivision.

History.

(§ 6 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Sec. 14.40.600.
Regulations.

A community college established by the university in cooperation with school districts or political subdivisions shall be established, maintained, and operated under rules and regulations adopted by the board.
The selection and academic qualifications for personnel and the curriculum of a community college, insofar as it pertains to academic degree programs and activities, is the responsibility of the board.
The selection and qualifications of personnel for nondegree programs and activities of the community college are the responsibility of the governing body of the school district or political subdivision.

History.

(§ 7 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Sec. 14.40.610.
Disposition of income.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

All money, including tuition and fees received before or after April 10, 1962, from the operations of a community college established, operated, and maintained under AS

14.40.560

—

14.40.640

and directly related or attributable to nondegree programs and activities of the community college, shall be placed in the appropriate fund of the qualified school district or political subdivision cooperating with the university in the establishment of the community college.

History.

(§ 8 ch 75 SLA 1962; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.40.620.
Savings clause.

An agreement between the University of Alaska and a community college in effect on April 10, 1962, shall remain in effect until its agreed expiration unless, before the agreed expiration, it is mutually cancelled or modified by the contracting parties.

History.

(§ 10 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Sec. 14.40.630.
Definitions.

In AS

14.40.560

—

14.40.640

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“board of regents” or “board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska;

“community college” means a program of education established by the University of Alaska in cooperation with qualified school districts or qualified political subdivisions of the state, including both academic degree and nondegree programs;

“qualified school district” or “qualified political subdivision” means a school district or political subdivision organized under the laws of the state, or a group of two or more contiguous school districts or political subdivisions of the state, or a combination of each, which combination, considered as a unit, meets the following minimum requirements for the establishment of a community college:

makes application to the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska for participation in the community college program;

satisfies educational standards of the University of Alaska according to criteria established by the Board of Regents;

has had an average daily membership during the previous school year of at least 75 high school students, grades 9-12;

has established to the satisfaction of the Board of Regents the practical need for a community college within the district or political subdivision; and

makes arrangements for defraying its proper share of the costs of the operation and maintenance of a community college, as provided by the terms of AS

14.40.560

—

14.40.640

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 75 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 14.40.640.
Short title.

AS

14.40.560

—

14.40.640

may be cited as the Community College Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1962)